stems/mari-lexc.txt
LEXICON Prop
+avstralij   Prop ;  ! "(+avstra˙lij) $pp" 
avstralij   Prop ;  ! "Australia Prop" 
+avstrij   Prop ;  ! "(+avstrij) $pp" 
+azij   Prop ;  ! "(+˙azij) $pp" 
azij   Prop ;  ! "Aasia Prop" 
+ajmet   Prop ;  ! "(+ajmet) $pp" 
+albanij   Prop ;  ! "(+alba˙nij) $pp" 
albanij   Prop ;  ! "Albania Prop" 
+almakaj   Prop ;  ! "(+almakaj) $pp" 
alj1p   Prop ;  ! "Alpit Prop" 
+amerika   Prop ;  ! "(+ame˙rika) $pp" 
amerik^A   Prop ;  ! "Amerikka Prop" 
+anglij   Prop ;  ! "(+˙anglij) $pp" 
anglij   Prop ;  ! "Englanti Prop" 
+arabij   Prop ;  ! "(+ara˙bij) $pp" 
arabij   Prop ;  ! "Arabia Prop" 
+argentina   Prop ;  ! "(+argenti˙na) $pp" 
argentin^A   Prop ;  ! "Argentiina Prop" 
+ardas1   Prop ;  ! "(+ardaS) $pp" 
+arslanbyk   Prop ;  ! "(+arslanbYk) $pp" 
+atlantika   Prop ;  ! "(+atla˙ntika) $pp" 
atlantik^A   Prop ;  ! "Atlantti Prop" 
+afin   Prop ;  ! "(+afi˙n) $pp" 
afiny   Prop ;  ! "Ateena Prop" 
+afrika   Prop ;  ! "(+a˙frika) $pp" 
afrik^A   Prop ;  ! "Afrikka Prop" 
baltik   Prop ;  ! "Itämeri Prop" 
+belj1gij   Prop ;  ! "(+be˙l<gij) $pp" 
belj1gij   Prop ;  ! "Belgia Prop" 
+bolgarij   Prop ;  ! "(+bolga˙rij) $pp" 
bolgarij   Prop ;  ! "Bulgaria Prop" 
+brazilij   Prop ;  ! "(+brazi˙lij) $pp" 
brazilij   Prop ;  ! "Brasilia Prop" 
+budapes1t   Prop ;  ! "(+budape˙St) $pp" 
budapes1t   Prop ;  ! "Budapest Prop" 
+vak-sola   Prop ;  ! "(+vak-sola) $pp" 
+varman   Prop ;  ! "(+varman) $pp" 
+vars1ava   Prop ;  ! "(+varSa˙va) $pp" 
vars1av^A   Prop ;  ! "Varsova Prop" 
+vasilj1-ola   Prop ;  ! "(+vasil<-ola) $pp" 
+vengrij   Prop ;  ! "(+ve˙ngrij) $pp" 
vengrij   Prop ;  ! "Unkari Prop" 
+vic1e   Prop ;  ! "(+vi˙Ce) $pp" 
vic1^E   Prop ;  ! "Vjatka Prop" 
+germanij   Prop ;  ! "(+germa˙nij) $pp" 
germanij   Prop ;  ! "Saksa Prop" 
+dara1   Prop ;  ! "(+darA) $pp" 
+dunaj   Prop ;  ! "(+duna˙j) $pp" 
dunaj   Prop ;  ! "Tonava Prop" 
+evropa   Prop ;  ! "(+evro˙pa) $pp" 
evrop^A   Prop ;  ! "Eurooppa Prop" 
+izikokuj   Prop ;  ! "(+izikokuj) $pp" 
+izrailj1   Prop ;  ! "(+izra˙il<) $pp" 
+izymarij   Prop ;  ! "(+izYmarij) $pp" 
+ilj1na-ola   Prop ;  ! "(+il<na-ola) $pp" 
+islandij   Prop ;  ! "(+isla˙ndij) $pp" 
+ispanij   Prop ;  ! "(+ispa˙nij) $pp" 
ispanij   Prop ;  ! "Espanja Prop" 
+italij   Prop ;  ! "(+italij) $pp" 
italij   Prop ;  ! "Italia Prop" 
+jos1kar-+ola   Prop ;  ! "(+joSka˙r-+ola˙) $pp" 
+ju2zbika   Prop ;  ! "(+jyzbika) $pp" 
+jyldyrvika   Prop ;  ! "(+jYldYrvika) $pp" 
+kavan-er   Prop ;  ! "(+kavan-er) $pp" 
+kaks1an   Prop ;  ! "(+kakSa˙n) $pp" 
kaks1an   Prop ;  ! "(joki) Koks`aga Prop" 
+karelij   Prop ;  ! "(+kare˙lij) $pp" 
karelij   Prop ;  ! "Karjala Prop" 
+kec1amys1   Prop ;  ! "(+keCamYS) $pp" 
+kikpaj   Prop ;  ! "(+kikpaj) $pp" 
+kitaj   Prop ;  ! "(+kita˙j) $pp" 
kitaj   Prop ;  ! "Kiina Prop" 
+koz1demyr   Prop ;  ! "(+koZdemYr) $pp" 
+kokla-lon1go   Prop ;  ! "(+kokla-loNgo) $pp" 
+koks1aj   Prop ;  ! "(+kokSaj) $pp" 
+koks1ar   Prop ;  ! "(+kokSar) $pp" 
korkas1u2dyr   Prop ;  ! "Otava Prop" 
+kugu-+kaks1an   Prop ;  ! "(+kugu-+kakSan) $pp" 
+kugu-+kokuj   Prop ;  ! "(+kugu-+kokuj) $pp" 
+kuz1-nur   Prop ;  ! "(+kuZ-nur) $pp" 
+kurymzak   Prop ;  ! "(+kurYmzak) $pp" 
+kuc1yvaj   Prop ;  ! "(+kuCYvaj) $pp" 
+ku2s1yl-sokaza   Prop ;  ! "(+kySYl-sokaza) $pp" 
+lajys1-ola   Prop ;  ! "(+lajYS-ola) $pp" 
+laplandij   Prop ;  ! "(+lapla˙ndij) $pp" 
leningrad   Prop ;  ! "Leningrad Prop" 
+lenin-ola   Prop ;  ! "(+lenin-ola) $pp" 
+lepes1kan   Prop ;  ! "(+lepeSkan) $pp" 
+makara1   Prop ;  ! "(+makarA) $pp" 
+makara1-ku2   Prop ;  ! "(+makarA-ky) $pp" 
+marie1l   Prop ;  ! "(+mariE˙l) $pp" 
+mara1   Prop ;  ! "(+marA) $pp" 
+mende   Prop ;  ! "(+mende) $pp" 
+menc1yla   Prop ;  ! "(+menCYla) $pp" 
+meran1   Prop ;  ! "(+meraN) $pp" 
+monar   Prop ;  ! "(+monar) $pp" 
+mosko   Prop ;  ! "(+mosko˙) $pp" 
mosko   Prop ;  ! "Moskova Prop" 
+niderlandij   Prop ;  ! "(+niderla˙ndij) $pp" 
niderlandij   Prop ;  ! "Alankomaat Prop" 
+novgorod   Prop ;  ! "(+no˙vgorod) $pp" 
+norvegij   Prop ;  ! "(+norve˙gij) $pp" 
+ozan1   Prop ;  ! "(+ozaN) $pp" 
+orymbor   Prop ;  ! "(+orYmbor) $pp" 
+os1-+vic1e   Prop ;  ! "(+oS-+viCe) $pp" 
+pajras1   Prop ;  ! "(+pajraS) $pp" 
+parna1kaj   Prop ;  ! "(+parnAkaj) $pp" 
+peks1ik   Prop ;  ! "(+pekSik) $pp" 
+perme   Prop ;  ! "(+perme) $pp" 
+peterburg   Prop ;  ! "(+peterbu˙rg) $pp" 
+petyrvor   Prop ;  ! "(+petYrvor) $pp" 
+pityr   Prop ;  ! "(+pitYr) $pp" 
+polj1s1a   Prop ;  ! "(+po˙l<Sa) $pp" 
polj1s1^A   Prop ;  ! "Puola Prop" 
+pos1kyrt   Prop ;  ! "(+po˙SkYrt) $pp" 
+po1klende   Prop ;  ! "(+pOklende) $pp" 
+pribaltika   Prop ;  ! "(+priba˙ltika) $pp" 
pribaltik^A   Prop ;  ! "Baltia Prop" 
+pu2evu2d   Prop ;  ! "(+pyevy˙d) $pp" 
pu2evu2d   Prop ;  ! "Buj Prop" 
+pu2nc1er   Prop ;  ! "(+pynCer) $pp" 
+pu2ro1   Prop ;  ! "(+pyrO) $pp" 
+pu2ro1vu2d   Prop ;  ! "(+pyrOvy˙d) $pp" 
pu2ro1vu2d   Prop ;  ! "Bir Prop" 
+pu2ro1-ola   Prop ;  ! "(+pyrO-ola) $pp" 
+pylac1ok   Prop ;  ! "(+pYlaCok) $pp" 
+riga   Prop ;  ! "(+ri˙ga) $pp" 
riga   Prop ;  ! "Riika Prop" 
+rossij   Prop ;  ! "(+rossi˙j) $pp" 
rossij   Prop ;  ! "Venäjä Prop" 
+rumynij   Prop ;  ! "(+rumY˙nij) $pp" 
rumynij   Prop ;  ! "Romania Prop" 
+sajtij   Prop ;  ! "(+sajtij) $pp" 
+sankt-+peterburg   Prop ;  ! "(+sankt-+peterburg) $pp" 
+sia1   Prop ;  ! "(+siA) $pp" 
+sia1-ola   Prop ;  ! "(+siA-ola) $pp" 
+suomi   Prop ;  ! "(+su˙omi) $pp" 
+su2vo1   Prop ;  ! "(+syvO) $pp" 
+su2vya1l   Prop ;  ! "(+syvYAl) $pp" 
+su2ndu2r   Prop ;  ! "(+syndyr) $pp" 
+symbyr-ola   Prop ;  ! "(+sYmbYr-ola) $pp" 
+tallinn   Prop ;  ! "(+ta˙llinn) $pp" 
+tanyp-vu2d   Prop ;  ! "(+tanYp-vyd) $pp" 
+toktar   Prop ;  ! "(+toktar) $pp" 
+tosyndo   Prop ;  ! "(+tosYndo) $pp" 
+to1ldo1   Prop ;  ! "(+tOldO) $pp" 
+to1n1gak   Prop ;  ! "(+tONgak) $pp" 
+to1rgym   Prop ;  ! "(+tOrgYm) $pp" 
+to1rgym-tu2r   Prop ;  ! "(+tOrgYm-tyr) $pp" 
+to1rmet   Prop ;  ! "(+tOrmet) $pp" 
+tylc1ak   Prop ;  ! "(+tYlCak) $pp" 
+tymbaj   Prop ;  ! "(+tYmbaj) $pp" 
+ugarman   Prop ;  ! "(+ugarma˙n) $pp" 
+u-korak   Prop ;  ! "(+u-korak) $pp" 
u2p^E   Prop ;  ! "Ufa Prop" 
+u2po1   Prop ;  ! "(+ypO) $pp" 
+u2po1-vu2d   Prop ;  ! "(+ypO-vyd) $pp" 
+u2po1n   Prop ;  ! "(+ypOn) $pp" 
+finla1ndij   Prop ;  ! "(+finlA˙ndij) $pp" 
finla1ndij   Prop ;  ! "Suomi Prop" 
+hazan   Prop ;  ! "(+xazan) $pp" 
+helj1sinki   Prop ;  ! "(+xe˙l<sinki) $pp" 
helj1sinki   Prop ;  ! "Helsinki Prop" 
+c1arla   Prop ;  ! "(+Carla˙) $pp" 
c1arla   Prop ;  ! "(vanh.) JoSkar-Ola Prop" 
+c1olkop   Prop ;  ! "(+Colkop) $pp" 
+c1olman   Prop ;  ! "(+Colman) $pp" 
c1olman   Prop ;  ! "Kama Prop" 
+c1oraj   Prop ;  ! "(+Coraj) $pp" 
+s1avas1ar   Prop ;  ! "(+SavaSar) $pp" 
+s1anc1ara   Prop ;  ! "(+SanCara) $pp" 
+s1vecij   Prop ;  ! "(+Sve˙cij) $pp" 
s1vecij   Prop ;  ! "Ruotsi Prop" 
+s1ernur   Prop ;  ! "(+Sernur) $pp" 
+s1obas1en1er   Prop ;  ! "(+SobaSeNer) $pp" 
s1oktes1u2dyr   Prop ;  ! "Seulaset Prop" 
+e1z1vu2d   Prop ;  ! "(+EZvyd) $pp" 
+e1lnet   Prop ;  ! "(+Elne˙t) $pp" 
e1lnet   Prop ;  ! "Iletjoki Prop" 
+e1stonij   Prop ;  ! "(+Esto˙nij) $pp" 
e1stonij   Prop ;  ! "Viro Prop" 
+e1s1ym   Prop ;  ! "(+ESYm) $pp" 
+u1l   Prop ;  ! "(+Ul) $pp" 
u1l   Prop ;  ! "Volga Prop" 
+a1ran   Prop ;  ! "(+Aran) $pp" 
+a1rmet   Prop ;  ! "(+Armet) $pp" 
